Maryland, session 2026, HB1641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
[11–704.
The District Court may not, in aid of enforcement or execution of a money judgment
resulting from a small claim action under § 4–405 of this article, order an individual to:
(1) Appear for an examination; or
(2) Answer interrogatories.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1641*